Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB271.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$275,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account
established by KRS 48.705 to the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky (SEEK)
Program budget unit.
Notwithstanding KRS 157.420, during fiscal year 2025-2026, local school districts
shall provide each eligible employee a salary or compensation increase of five percent.
The salary increases in fiscal year 2025-2026 for certified staff shall be in addition to the
normal rank and step increase attained by certified personnel employed by local school
districts.
An eligible employee employed in a public school, shall receive a five percent
increase effective with the 2025-2026 school year. As used in this section, "eligible
employee" means a full-time employee of the district on or before September 15 of each
school year.
The salary supplement shall be considered in the calculation for contributions to the
Teachers’ Retirement System or the County Employees’ Retirement System.
A local board of education shall request reimbursement from the Department of
Education for these purposes from funds appropriated for this purpose. The Department
of Education shall develop policies for the distribution of the reimbursements and to track
the eligible employees and reimbursement requests from districts.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/30/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed